nb: Sikkerhetssertifiseringer: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-fri; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-godkjent; Næringsmiddelgodkjent; JPMA; Blyfri; Giftfri; OEKO-TEX; Ftalatfri; RoHS; UL; Annet
zh-CN: 安全认证: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; 不含双酚 A; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA 认证; 食品级; JPMA; 无铅; 无毒; OEKO-TEX; 不含邻苯二甲酸盐; RoHS; UL; 其他
ro-RO: Certificări de siguranță: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Fără BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Aprobat de FDA; De uz alimentar; JPMA; Fără plumb; Non-toxic; OEKO-TEX; Fără ftalați; RoHS; UL; Altele
pl: Certyfikaty bezpieczeństwa: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Zatwierdzone przez FDA; Do kontaktu z żywnością; JPMA; Bez ołowiu; Nietoksyczne; OEKO-TEX; Bez ftalanów; RoHS; UL; Inne
de: Sicherheitszertifizierungen: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-frei; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-zugelassen; Lebensmittelecht; JPMA; Bleifrei; Ungiftig; OEKO-TEX; Phthalatfrei; RoHS; UL; Sonstiges
da: Sikkerhedscertificeringer: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-fri; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-godkendt; Fødevaregodkendt; JPMA; Blyfri; Giftfri; OEKO-TEX; Phthalat-fri; RoHS; UL; Andet
fi: Turvallisuussertifikaatit: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-vapaa; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-hyväksytty; Elintarvikekelpoinen; JPMA; Lyijytön; Myrkytön; OEKO-TEX; Ftalaatiton; RoHS; UL; Muu
cs: Certifikace bezpečnosti: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Schváleno FDA; Potravinářská kvalita; JPMA; Bez olova; Netoxické; OEKO-TEX; Bez ftalátů; RoHS; UL; Jiné
nl: Veiligheidscertificeringen: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-vrij; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-goedgekeurd; Geschikt voor levensmiddelen; JPMA; Loodvrij; Niet-giftig; OEKO-TEX; Ftalaatvrij; RoHS; UL; Andere
ko: 안전 인증: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-free; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA 승인; 식품 등급; JPMA; 무연; 무독성; OEKO-TEX; 프탈레이트 프리; RoHS; UL; 기타
sv: Säkerhetscertifieringar: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Fri från BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA-godkänd; Livsmedelsgodkänd; JPMA; Blyfri; Giftfri; OEKO-TEX; Ftalatfri; RoHS; UL; Övrigt
ja: 安全認証: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPAフリー; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA承認済み; 食品グレード; JPMA; 鉛フリー; 非毒性; OEKO-TEX; フタル酸エステルフリー; RoHS; UL; その他
tr: Güvenlik Sertifikaları: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA içermez; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA Onaylı; Gıdaya Uygun; JPMA; Kurşunsuz; Toksik İçermez; OEKO-TEX; Fitalat içermez; RoHS; UL; Diğer
sl-SI: Varnostni certifikati: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Brez BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Odobreno s strani FDA; Primerno za živila; JPMA; Brez svinca; Nestrupeno; OEKO-TEX; Brez ftalatov; RoHS; UL; Drugo
bg-BG: Сертификати за безопасност: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Без BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Одобрено от FDA; Подходящо за храни; JPMA; Без олово; Нетоксично; OEKO-TEX; Без фталати; RoHS; UL; Други
hu: Biztonsági tanúsítványok: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-mentes; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA által jóváhagyott; Élelmiszeripari minőségű; JPMA; Ólommentes; Nem mérgező; OEKO-TEX; Ftalátmentes; RoHS; UL; Egyéb
hr-HR: Potvrde o sigurnosti: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Odobrila FDA; Prehrambena kvaliteta; JPMA; Bez olova; Netoksično; OEKO-TEX; Bez ftalata; RoHS; UL; Ostalo
pt-PT: Certificações de segurança: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Sem BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Aprovado pela FDA; Qualidade alimentar; JPMA; Sem chumbo; Não tóxico; OEKO-TEX; Sem ftalatos; RoHS; UL; Outro
vi: Chứng nhận an toàn: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Không chứa BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Được FDA phê duyệt; Cấp thực phẩm; JPMA; Không chứa chì; Không độc hại; OEKO-TEX; Không chứa phthalate; RoHS; UL; Khác
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné certifikácie: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Schválené FDA; Potravinárska kvalita; JPMA; Bez olova; Netoxické; OEKO-TEX; Bez ftalátov; RoHS; UL; Iné
pt-BR: Certificações de segurança: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Livre de BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Aprovado pela FDA; Grau alimentício; JPMA; Sem chumbo; Atóxico; OEKO-TEX; Livre de ftalatos; RoHS; UL; Outro
en: Safety certifications: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; BPA-free; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA Approved; Food Grade; JPMA; Lead-Free; Non-Toxic; OEKO-TEX; Phthalate-free; RoHS; UL; Other
es: Certificaciones de seguridad: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Sin BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Aprobado por la FDA; Grado alimenticio; JPMA; Sin plomo; No tóxico; OEKO-TEX; Libre de ftalatos; RoHS; UL; Otros
lt-LT: Saugos sertifikatai: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Be BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Patvirtinta FDA; Maistinės klasės; JPMA; Be švino; Netoksiškas; OEKO-TEX; Be ftalatų; RoHS; UL; Kita
el: Πιστοποιήσεις ασφαλείας: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Χωρίς BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Εγκεκριμένο από τον FDA; Κατάλληλο για τρόφιμα; JPMA; Χωρίς μόλυβδο; Μη τοξικό; OEKO-TEX; Χωρίς φθαλικές ενώσεις; RoHS; UL; Άλλο
ru: Сертификаты безопасности: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Без BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Одобрено FDA; Пищевой класс; JPMA; Без свинца; Нетоксичный; OEKO-TEX; Без фталатов; RoHS; UL; Другой
zh-TW: 安規驗證: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; 不含雙酚 A; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; FDA 核准; 食品級; JPMA; 無鉛; 無毒; OEKO-TEX; 無塑化劑; RoHS; UL; 其他
th: ใบรับรองความปลอดภัย: ANSI/BIFMA; มาตรฐาน ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; ปลอดสาร BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; มาตรฐาน EN 71; FCC; ผ่านการรับรองจาก FDA; ฟู้ดเกรด; JPMA; ไร้สารตะกั่ว; ปลอดสารพิษ; OEKO-TEX; ปราศจากสารพาทาเลต; RoHS; UL; อื่นๆ
fr: Certifications de sécurité: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Sans BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Approuvé par la FDA; Qualité alimentaire; JPMA; Sans plomb; Non toxique; OEKO-TEX; Sans phtalates; RoHS; UL; Autre
it: Certificazioni di sicurezza: ANSI/BIFMA; ASTM F1967-19; ASTM F963; Senza BPA; CE; CPSC; CPSIA; EN 71; FCC; Approvato dalla FDA; Per uso alimentare; JPMA; Senza piombo; Atossico; OEKO-TEX; Senza ftalati; RoHS; UL; Altro